Rhode Island, session 2025, SB510.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-8-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-8 entitled "Construction
and Maintenance of State Roads" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-8-11. Beautification.
(a) The department of transportation is hereby authorized and empowered to plant trees,
shrubs, forbs, and grasses and otherwise beautify the area within the limits of a road, including state
highways in a manner and at locations as the department may deem advisable,. Plantings shall
include pollinator-friendly native species when appropriate and the cost of the work shall be paid
from moneys, appropriated for highway purposes, not otherwise needed for the construction,
reconstruction and maintenance of state roads and bridges; and the state controller is hereby
authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such
sums as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved
by the director of transportation. The department shall seek suggestions from apiarists,
horticulturists and other certified professionals to identify the appropriate types of plants and
locations that benefits pollinators. For purposes of this section "pollinators" means insects to
include, but not limited to, bees that help carry pollen from the male part of the flower to the female
part of the same or another flower.
(b) Any and all activities performed by the department of transportation to benefit
pollinators on roadsides and state highways shall be consistent with the best practices required in §

23 U.S.C. 332.
LC001460 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001460
========
LC001460 - Page 3 of 4